Illinois, session 104th, SB1440.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Occupational Safety and Health Act is 5amended by changing Section 85 as follows: 6    (820 ILCS 219/85)7    Sec. 85. Civil penalties.8    (a) After an inspection of a workplace under this Act, if 9the Director issues a citation, he or she shall, within 5 days 10after issuing the citation, notify the employer by certified 11mail, or by email to an email address previously designated by 12the employer for purposes of receiving notice under this Act, 13of any civil penalty proposed to be assessed for the violation 14set forth in the citation. 15    (b) If the Director has reason to believe that an employer 16has failed to correct a violation for which a citation has been 17issued within the period permitted for its correction, the 18Director shall notify the employer by certified mail, or by 19email to an email address previously designated by the 20employer for purposes of receiving notice under this Act, of 21that failure and of the civil penalty proposed to be assessed 22for that failure. 23    (c) Civil penalties authorized under this Section are as   SB1440- 2 -LRB104 06347 SPS 16383 b1follows: 2        (1) A public employer that repeatedly violates this 3    Act, the Safety Inspection and Education Act, or the 4    Health and Safety Act, or any combination of those Acts, 5    or any standard, rule, regulation, or order under any of 6    those Acts, may be assessed a civil penalty of not more 7    than $10,000 per violation. 8        (2) A public employer that willfully intentionally 9    violates this Act, the Safety Inspection and Education 10    Act, or the Health and Safety Act, or any standard, rule, 11    regulation, or order under any of those Acts, or who 12    demonstrates plain indifference to any provision of any of 13    those Acts or any such standard, rule, regulation, or 14    order, may be assessed a civil penalty of not more than 15    $70,000 $10,000 per violation.16        (3) A public employer that has received a citation for 17    a serious violation of this Act, the Safety Inspection and 18    Education Act, or the Health and Safety Act, or any 19    standard, rule, regulation, or order under any of those 20    Acts, may be assessed a civil penalty up to $1,000 for each 21    such violation. 22        (4) A public employer that has received a citation for 23    a violation of this Act, the Safety Inspection and 24    Education Act, or the Health and Safety Act, or any 25    standard, rule, regulation, or order under any of those 26    Acts, which is not a serious violation, may be assessed a   SB1440- 3 -LRB104 06347 SPS 16383 b1    civil penalty of up to $1,000 for each such violation. 2        (5) A public employer that violates a posting 3    requirement is subject to the following citations and 4    proposed penalty structure: 5            (A) Job Safety and Health Poster: an other than 6        serious citation and a proposed penalty of $1,000. 7            (B) Annual Summary of Work-Related Injuries and 8        Illnesses (OSHA Form 300A): an other than serious 9        citation and a proposed penalty of $1,000, even if 10        there are no recordable injuries or illnesses. 11            (C) Citation: an other than serious citation and a 12        proposed penalty of $1,000. 13        (6) A public employer that fails to correct a 14    violation for which a citation has been issued within the 15    time period permitted may be assessed a civil penalty of 16    up to $1,000 for each day the violation continues. 17    (d) For purposes of this Section, a "serious violation" 18shall be deemed to exist in a workplace if there is a 19substantial probability that death or serious physical harm 20could result from (i) a condition which exists or (ii) one or 21more practices, means, methods, operations, or processes which 22have been adopted or are in use in the workplace, unless the 23employer did not know and could not, with the exercise of 24reasonable diligence, have known of the presence of the 25violation. 26    (e) The Director may assess civil penalties as provided in   SB1440- 4 -LRB104 06347 SPS 16383 b1this Section, giving due consideration to the appropriateness 2of the penalty. A penalty may be reduced by the Director or the 3Director's authorized representative based on the public 4employer's good faith, size of business, and history of 5previous violations. 6    (f) The Attorney General may bring an action in the 7circuit court to enforce the collection of any civil penalty 8assessed under this Act.9    (g) All civil penalties collected under this Act shall be 10deposited into the General Revenue Fund of the State of 11Illinois. 12(Source: P.A. 102-705, eff. 1-1-23.)